src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON CASE1
+Nom:     #   ;
+Gen:     #   ;

LEXICON NUM1

CASE1 ;
+Pl:%>д CASE1 ;

LEXICON NUM2

CASE1 ;
+Pl:%>м%{U%}д CASE1 ; ! 

LEXICON NUM3

CASE1 ;
+Pl:%>с CASE1 ;

LEXICON N1

+N: NUM1 ;

LEXICON N2

+N: NUM2 ;

LEXICON N3

+N: NUM3 ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
